Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12.3 The Environmental Injury Compensation Act

46-12.3-1.
Proceedings for enforcement.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this chapter. Venue shall exist in the county where the plaintiff is located or in Providence County, at the election of the plaintiff. A civil action may be instituted by the attorney general or by any person, corporation, partnership, or other business entity for damages sustained as a result of a violation of the provisions of chapter 9 or 9.1 of title 46, regarding the obligation of a vessel to have a licensed pilot on board prior to entering a navigable waterway of the state, or chapter 12 of title 46, regarding water pollution, or any violation of any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant thereto by the owner, operator, and/or his or her or its agent of a seagoing vessel, as defined in §

46-9-2

, or as a result of the negligence of the owner, operator, or agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 198, § 1.

46-12.3-2.
Strict liability.

The owner, operator, and/or his or her or its agent of any seagoing vessel, as defined in §

46-9-2

, entering the waters or waterways of this state who shall violate the provisions of chapter 9 or 9.1 of title 46, regarding the obligation of a vessel to have a licensed pilot on board prior to entering a navigable waterway of the state or chapter 12 of title 46, regarding water pollution or any violation of any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant thereto, shall be strictly liable for any injury or damage resulting from the violation, including, but not limited to, damage or injury to the environment or natural resources of the state, injury to the person, property damage, or economic loss to any individual, corporation, partnership, or other business entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 198, § 1.

46-12.3-3.
Action on negligence.

Any person who sustains personal injury, property damage, or economic loss as a result of the negligent act of any owner, operator, and/or his or her or its agent of any seagoing vessel as defined in §

46-9-2

, entering the waters or waterways of this state, shall be entitled to maintain an action to recover the damages pursuant to the provisions of §

46-12.3-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 198, § 1.

46-12.3-4.
Recovery for economic loss.

A person shall be entitled to recover for economic loss, pursuant to §§

46-12.3-2

and

46-12.3-3

, if the person can demonstrate the loss of income or diminution of profit to a person or business as a result of damage to the natural resources of the state of Rhode Island caused by the violation of any provision of chapter 9 or 9.1 of title 46, regarding the obligation of a vessel to have a licensed pilot on board prior to entering a navigable waterway of the state, or chapter 12 of title 46, regarding water pollution, or any violation of any permit, rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant thereto by the owner or operator and/or their agents of the seagoing vessel and/or caused by the negligence of the owner or operator and/or their agents of the seagoing vessel.

In any suit brought to recover economic loss, it shall not be necessary to prove that the loss was sustained as a result of physical injury to the person or damage to his or her property, nor shall it be a defense to any claim that the defendant owed no special duty to the plaintiff or that the loss was the result of governmental action taken in response to the violation and/or negligence of the defendant.

Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, persons engaged in commercial fishing or shellfishing and/or the processors of fish or shellfish, who can demonstrate that they have sustained a loss of income or profit as a result of damage to the environment resulting from violations of chapter 9 or 9.1 of title 46, regarding the obligation of a vessel to have a licensed pilot on board prior to entering a navigable waterway of the state, or chapter 12 of title 46, regarding water pollution or any violation of any permit, rule, regulation or order pursuant thereto by the owner or operator and/or their agents of a seagoing vessel and/or caused by the negligence of the owner and/or agent of a seagoing vessel, shall have a cause of action for economic loss. Persons employed by, or who operate businesses, who have sustained a loss of income or profit as a result of a decrease in the volume of business caused by the damage to the environment shall also be entitled to maintain an action for economic loss.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 198, § 1.

46-12.3-5.
Attorney general — Suits parens patriae.

The attorney general may bring a civil action in superior court in the name of the state, as parens patriae on behalf of persons residing in this state, to secure monetary relief as provided in this chapter for injuries sustained by persons to their person, property, or economic loss by reason of any violation of this chapter. The court shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief awarded in an action any amount of monetary relief:

Which duplicates amounts which have been awarded for the same injury under state or federal law; or

Which is properly allocable to persons who have excluded their claims pursuant to subsection (c)(2) of this section.

The court shall award the state as monetary relief twofold the total damage sustained as described in subsection (a) of this section, and the costs of suit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee.

In any action brought under subsection (a) of this section the attorney general shall, at such times, in such manner, and with such content as the court may direct, cause notice thereof to be given by publication.

Any person on whose behalf an action is brought under subsection (a) may elect to exclude from adjudication the portion of the state claim for monetary relief attributable to him or her by filing notice of the election with the court within such time as specified in the notice given pursuant to subsection (c)(1).

The final judgment in an action under subsection (a) shall be res judicata as to any claim under §§

46-12.3-2

,

46-12.3-3

, and

46-12.3-4

by any person on behalf of whom the action was brought and who fails to give notice within the period specified in the notice given pursuant to subsection (c)(1).

An action under subsection (a) shall not be dismissed or compromised without the approval of the court, and notice of any proposed dismissal or compromise shall be given by publication at such times, in such manner, and with such content as the court may direct.

In any action under subsection (a):

The amount of the plaintiff’s attorney’s fees, if any, shall be determined by the court, and any attorney’s fees awarded to the attorney general shall be deposited with the state as general revenues; and

Monetary relief recovered in an action under this section shall:

Be distributed in such manner as the court in its discretion may authorize; or

Be deemed a civil penalty by the court and deposited with the state as general revenues; subject in either case to the requirement that any distribution procedure adopted afford each person a reasonable opportunity to secure his or her appropriate portion of the net monetary relief.

In any action under this section the fact that a person or public body has not dealt directly with the defendant or that the defendant owed no special duty to the plaintiff or that the loss was the result of governmental action in response to the violation and/or negligence of the defendant shall not bar or otherwise limit recovery; provided, however, the court shall exclude from the amount of monetary relief awarded in an action any amount of monetary relief which duplicates amounts which have been awarded for the same injury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 198, § 1.

46-12.3-6.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person, agency, or circumstances, is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the chapter and the application of the provisions to other persons, agencies, or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the validity of the remainder of the chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 198, § 1.

46-12.3-7.
Remedies cumulative.

The remedies provided for in this chapter are in addition to all other remedies available in law or in equity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 198, § 1.

46-12.3-8.
Responders liability.

Nothing in this chapter or any other provision of law shall be construed to hold persons, other than those responsible for the initial discharge, who render care, assistance or advice with respect to the discharge of petroleum or petroleum products into or on the waters of the state, regarding the amelioration of environmental damage caused by the discharge, strictly liable for their acts or omissions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who takes action or omits to take actions in rendering care, assistance or advice relating to containment and clean up of or otherwise responding to a discharge or threat of discharge of petroleum or petroleum products into or on the surface waters of the state, consistent with the national contingency plan or as otherwise directed by the federal on-scene coordinator or by the director of the department of environmental management, shall not be liable for any costs, expenses or damages of any kind; provided, however, that this limitation shall not apply to such costs, expenses and/or damages that are a proximate result of that person’s gross negligence or willful misconduct, and provided further this exemption shall not apply with respect to personal injury or wrongful death.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person responsible for the initial discharge shall be liable for any and all costs, expenses or damages for which a responder is relieved of liability under this section, and any injured person with a claim against a person who is relieved of liability by this section may bring an action for recovery of the costs of cleanup and removal and direct and indirect damages directly against the person responsible for the initial discharge. Nothing in this section shall serve to limit or reduce the strict liability of a person responsible for the initial discharge for any injury or damage resulting from a discharge of petroleum or petroleum products, including, but not limited to, damage or injury to the environment or natural resources of the state, injury to the person, property damage or economic loss to any individual, corporation, partnership or other business entity.

Nothing in this section shall preclude any claim by any person seeking recovery for the costs of cleanup and removal or direct and indirect damages in an action brought directly against the person responsible for the initial discharge pursuant to any other provisions of the general laws or pursuant to common law, or limit the damages which can be awarded in such action.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an owner, operator or a person holding a masters license to operate a vessel is not liable for cleanup and removal costs or damages which result from actions taken in good faith in the course of rendering assistance, in an emergency situation, at the request of the owner or operator of a vessel attempting to prevent the substantial threat of a discharge of petroleum into or upon the waters of the state; provided however, that reasonable efforts are made to notify the federal on scene coordinator or the director of the department of environmental management or his or her designee prior to such assistance being rendered or, if that is not practicable, as soon as possible thereafter. This limitation shall not apply to such costs, expenses or damages that are the proximate result of that masters gross negligence or willful misconduct, and provide further that this exemption shall not apply with respect to personal injury or wrongful death.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 32, § 4.